Washington statutes.
RCW 36.89.040

Issuance of general obligation bonds—Proposition submitted to voters.

To carry out the purposes of this chapter counties shall have the power to issue general obligation bonds within the limitations now or hereafter prescribed by the Constitution and laws of this state. Such general obligation bonds shall be issued and sold as provided in chapter 39.46 RCW.

The question of issuance of bonds for any undertaking which relates to a number of different highways or parts thereof, whether situated wholly or partly within the limits of any city or town within the county, and whether such bonds are intended to supply the whole expenditure or to participate therein, may be submitted to the voters of the county as a single proposition. If the county legislative authority in submitting a proposition relating to different highways or parts thereof declare that such proposition has for its object the furtherance and accomplishment of the construction of a system of connected public highways within such county and constitutes a single purpose, such declaration shall be presumed to be correct and upon the issuance of the bonds the presumption shall become conclusive.

The question of the issuance of bonds for any undertaking which relates to a number of different open spaces, park, recreation and community facilities, whether situated wholly or partly within the limits of any city or town within the county, and whether such bonds are intended to supply the whole expenditure or to participate therein may be submitted to the voters as a single proposition. If the county legislative authority in submitting a proposition relating to different open spaces, park, recreation and community facilities declare that such proposition has for its object the furtherance, accomplishment or preservation of an open space, park, recreation and community facilities system available to, and for the benefit of, all the residents of such county and constitutes a single purpose, such declaration shall be presumed to be correct and upon the issuance of the bonds the presumption shall become conclusive.

The question of the issuance of bonds for any undertaking which relates to a number of different public health and safety facilities, whether situated wholly or partly within the limits of any city or town within the county, and whether such bonds are intended to supply the whole expenditure or to participate therein may be submitted to the voters as a single proposition. If the county legislative authority in submitting a proposition relating to different public health and safety facilities declare that such proposition has for its object the furtherance or accomplishment of a system of public health and safety facilities for the benefit of all the residents of such county and constitutes a single purpose, such declaration shall be presumed to be correct and upon the issuance of the bonds the presumption shall become conclusive.

The question of the issuance of bonds for any undertaking which relates to a number of different stormwater control facilities, whether situated wholly or partly within the limits of any city or town within the county, and whether such bonds are intended to supply the whole expenditure or to participate therein may be submitted to the voters as a single proposition. If the county legislative authority in submitting a proposition relating to different stormwater control facilities declares that such proposition has for its object the furtherance, accomplishment or preservation of a stormwater control facilities system for the benefit of all the residents of such county and constitutes a single purpose, such declaration shall be presumed to be correct and upon the issuance of the bonds the presumption shall become conclusive.

Elections shall be held as provided in RCW 39.36.050.

[ 1984 c 186 s 34; 1983 c 167 s 99; 1970 ex.s. c 30 s 4; 1967 c 109 s 4.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.